Massachusetts, session 194th, H2805.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the South Shore
Charter School, a charter school established pursuant to section 89 of chapter 71 of the general
laws, upon a vote of its board of directors, may accept the applicable provisions of chapter 32 of
the General Laws and thereby cause all eligible employees of the school, who are not eligible to
join the teachers retirement system pursuant to chapter . 32 of the general laws, to become Group
1 members of the state employees retirement system, effective January 1, 2017.
SECTION 2. (a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the state
employees retirement system shall grant creditable service to employees of the South Shore
Charter School who become members as provided for in section 1 of this act. Eligible members
of 3

shall have 1 opportunity to purchase creditable service for any service time to the South Shore
Charter School immediately prior to the implementation of this Act.
(b) Eligibility for creditable service for any such time shall be conditioned upon the
payment, in 1 lump sum or in installments upon such terms as the state employees retirement
system may provide, an amount equal to the contributions such employee would have otherwise
paid into the state employees retirement system had they been a member, at the contribution rate
when such members joined the system, plus actuarial-assumed interest.
SECTION 3. Within 60 days after the effective date of this act, the state employees
retirement system shall submit a request to the Internal Revenue Service seeking a letter of
determination or a ruling on whether this act may be implemented without impairing the
compliance of the state employees retirement system or the public employee retirement
administration commission with the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 as qualified pension
systems. The state employees retirement system shall submit all relevant and necessary
documentation to the Internal Revenue Service to assist in responding to the request.
SECTION 4. (a) Section 2 shall not take effect unless the Internal Revenue Service issues
a favorable letter of determination or a ruling, as the case may be, which states that the purchase
of service time described in this section shall not result in noncompliance of the state employees
retirement system or the public employee retirement administration commission with the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986.
(b) Within 60 days after receiving a favorable letter of determination or ruling from the
Internal Revenue Service, the state employees retirement system shall notify the members of
their eligibility for and the costs associated with this purchase of service. Within 120 days after
of 3

receiving notification of eligibility, members shall purchase the service in 1 lump sum or enter
into an installment agreement to pay for the service.
of 3